District of Columbia statutes.
23-1101

Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter —

(1)

the term “bonding business” means the business of becoming surety for compensation upon bonds in criminal cases in the District of Columbia; and

(2)

the term “bondsman” means any person or corporation engaged in the bonding business either as a principal or as an agent, clerk, or representative of another engaged in such business.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 635, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)
Bail, see §§ 16-704 and 23-1301 et seq.
1981 Ed., § 23-1101.
1973 Ed., § 23-1101.